src-fst-morphology-root.lexc.md
# FLAGS USED WITH VERB PREFIXES
* @U.VPref.akwan@
* @U.VPref.jol@
* @U.VPref.jola@
* @U.VPref.jot@
* @U.VPref.kon@
* @U.VPref.konalj@
* @U.VPref.konyl@
* @U.VPref.laakkwa@
* @U.VPref.lap@
* @U.VPref.ljaaljt@
* @U.VPref.naaluw@
* @U.VPref.noox@
* @U.VPref.nox@
* @U.VPref.paag@
* @U.VPref.paalyg@
* @U.VPref.pooxan@
* @U.VPref.pulig@
* @U.VPref.raawyg@
* @U.VPref.supyg@
* @U.VPref.taara@
* @U.VPref.tuw@
* @U.VPref.tyg@
* @U.VPref.xomi@
* @U.VPref.xot@
* @U.VPref.xoot@
* @U.VPref.eel@
* @U.VPref.eelalj@
* @U.VPref.juw@
* @U.VPref.juwle@
* @U.VPref.juil@

* @R.VPref.akwan@
* @R.VPref.jol@
* @R.VPref.jola@
* @R.VPref.jot@
* @R.VPref.kon@
* @R.VPref.konalj@
* @R.VPref.konyl@
* @R.VPref.laakkwa@
* @R.VPref.lap@
* @R.VPref.ljaaljt@
* @R.VPref.naaluw@
* @R.VPref.noox@
* @R.VPref.nox@
* @R.VPref.paag@
* @R.VPref.paalyg@
* @R.VPref.pooxan@
* @R.VPref.pulig@
* @R.VPref.raawyg@
* @R.VPref.supyg@
* @R.VPref.taara@
* @R.VPref.tuw@
* @R.VPref.tyg@
* @R.VPref.xomi@
* @R.VPref.xot@
* @R.VPref.xoot@
* @R.VPref.eel@
* @R.VPref.eelalj@
* @R.VPref.juw@
* @R.VPref.juwle@
* @R.VPref.juil@
* @U.VPref.ZERO@
* @D.VPref.ZERO@
* @R.VPref.ZERO@

* @U.VPref1.at@
* @U.VPref1.ul@
* @U.VPref1.ZERO@
* @R.VPref1.at@
* @R.VPref1.ul@
* @R.VPref1.ZERO@

* @U.VPref2.ZERO@
* @U.VPref2.vos@
* @U.VPref2.te@
* @U.VPref2.ke@
* @U.VPref2.ta@
* @U.VPref2.ty@

* @R.VPref2.ZERO@
* @R.VPref2.vos@
* @R.VPref2.te@
* @R.VPref2.ke@
* @R.VPref2.ta@
* @R.VPref2.ty@

* @D.VPref1.ZERO@
* @D.VPref1.at@
* @D.VPref1.ul@
* @D.VPref2.vos@
* @D.VPref2.te@
* @D.VPref2.ke@
* @D.VPref2.ta@
* @D.VPref2.ty@

# FLAGS USED WITH ERRORS, ORTHOGRAPHIC or others
* @U.ERRORTH.nohyphen@ +Err/Orth-no-hyphen
* @R.ERRORTH.nohyphen@
* @D.ERRORTH.nohyphen@

# FLAGS USED WITH COLLECTIVE NOUNS
## number
* @U.DECL-NX.SG@
* @U.DECL-NX.DU@
* @U.DECL-NX.PL@
* @R.DECL-NX.SG@
* @R.DECL-NX.DU@
* @R.DECL-NX.PL@
* @R.Pref1.at@
* @R.Pref2.ta@
* @R.Pref2.ty@

Removal
* @C.DECL-NX@ 
* @C.DECL-DX@ 
* @C.CX@ 
* @C.VPref@ юил/хот...
* @C.VPref1@ ат
* @C.VPref2@ та/ты
* @C.ERRORTH@

| Flag diacritic | Explanation
| :------------- |:-----------
| @U.number.one@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.two@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.three@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.four@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.five@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.six@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.seven@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.eight@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.nine@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.zero@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;

| @P.number.one@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @P.number.two@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @P.number.three@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @P.number.four@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @P.number.five@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @P.number.six@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @P.number.seven@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @P.number.eight@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @P.number.nine@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @P.number.ten@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @P.number.zero@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;

## The basic lexica

**LEXICON Root** 
The word forms in the MANSI language start from the lexeme roots of basic
word classes, or optionally from prefixes:
**Nouns ;** 
**Verbs ;**
**VPrefixes ;**
**Adjectives ;** 
**Adverbs ;** 
**Pronouns ;** 
**Numerals ;** 
**Conjunctions ;** 
**Interjections ;** 
**Participles ;** 
**Postpositions ;** 
**PROP_MANSINAMES ;** mansi-specific proper nouns
**urj-Cyrl-ProperNouns ;** common cyrillic proper nouns
**Punctuation ;** 
**Symbols ;** 
**Abbreviation ;** 
**foreign_words ;**

* **LEXICON K** for evt. clitic (goes to #)

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/root.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-mns/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/root.lexc)</small>
